Massachusetts, session 194th, H1369.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 27 of Chapter 23B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following:-
(a) In the case of a rental housing project that is determined to be a low and moderate
income rental housing project for seniors over the age of 55 and consisting of at least 50 units of
housing, the commonwealth, acting by and through the executive office of health and human
services, shall enter into contracts with sponsors of rental housing projects to fund senior
supportive care services for MassHealth enrollees.
Each such contract shall provide for a fixed payment of $2500 annually for each
MassHealth enrollee who resides in the designated rental housing project. Prior to entering into
any such contract, the executive office shall find: (1) that MassHealth enrollees constitute the
majority of residents in the rental housing project; (2) that the total amount of any fixed
payments to be provided appears to be the minimum amount necessary to fund senior supportive
of 2

care services, and (3) that the rental housing project has entered into cluster contracting with
homecare agencies.
The executive office shall publish a report annually on: (1) the total number of Medicaid
recipients living in such designated rental housing projects; and (2) cost savings to Medicaid
realized by cluster contracting for senior supportive care services in such designated rental
housing projects. The report shall be submitted to the general court, by filing it with the joint
committee on health care financing and the house and senate committees on ways and means.
of 2